Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2024
Inheritance tax; appraisement; costs; fees; charged to estate of decedent.

The appraisers shall be paid a reasonable fee to be fixed by the county judge, together with mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176 for state employees. Witnesses shall be allowed the sum of ten dollars per day for every day's attendance at an appraisal hearing, together with mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176 for state employees. The officer serving process under sections 77-2001 to 77-2037 shall receive the same fees as are now provided by law for similar services with mileage to be computed at the rate provided in section 33-117 for county sheriffs. When it is determined that an inheritance tax is due, all costs made or incurred in the determination and assessment of inheritance tax, including appraiser's fees, shall be charged to the estate of the decedent.

Laws 1901, c. 54, § 11, p. 418;

Laws 1907, c. 104, § 1, p. 359;

R.S.1913, § 6632;

Laws 1915, c. 113, § 1, p. 262;

C.S.1922, § 6163;

C.S.1929, § 77-2211;

R.S.1943, § 77-2024;

Laws 1953, c. 282, § 10, p. 919;

Laws 1959, c. 376, § 2, p. 1316;

Laws 1976, LB 585, § 18;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 152.